Utah statutes.
61-2b-15.   State-certified general appraiser -- Application --
Qualifications.
(1)  Each applicant for certification as a general appraiser shall provide to
the division evidence:
(a)  of completion of the certification examination with a satisfactory score
as determined by the board;
(b) (i)  of a bachelors degree or higher degree from an accredited college or
university; or
(ii)  of successfully passing a curriculum determined by rule of collegiate
level subject matter courses from an accredited:
(A)  college;
(B)  junior college;
(C)  community college; or
(D)  university;
(c)  of satisfactory completion of not less than 300 classroom hours in a
curriculum:
(i)  of specific appraisal education determined by rule; and
(ii)  that includes a course in the Uniform Standards of Professional Practice
or its equivalent that has been approved by the Appraisal Qualifications Board
of the Appraisal Foundation authorized by Title XI of the Financial
Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989;
(d)  of the minimum number of hours of experience in real property appraisal
as established by rule; and
(e)  that the experience required under Subsection (1)(d) is acquired within a
reasonable period, as determined by rule, immediately preceding the filing of
the application for certification.
(2)  Upon request by the division, the applicant shall make available to the
division for examination:
(a)  a detailed listing of the real estate appraisal reports or file memoranda
for each year for which experience is claimed; and
(b)  a sample selected by the division of appraisal reports that the applicant
has prepared in the course of the applicant's appraisal practice.
(3)  The classroom hours required by Subsection (1)(c) shall be provided by:
(a)  a college or university;
(b)  a community or junior college;
(c)  a real estate appraisal or real estate related organization;
(d)  a state or federal agency or commission;
(e)  a proprietary school;
(f)  a provider approved by a state certification and licensing agency; or
(g)  the Appraisal Foundation or its boards.
